Massachusetts, session 194th, H1556.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 20 of chapter 40B of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the
definition “Low or moderate income housing” and inserting in place thereof the following
definition:-
“Low or moderate income housing”, any housing subsidized by the federal or state
government under any program to assist the construction of low or moderate income housing as
defined in the applicable federal or state statute, whether built or operated by any public agency
or any nonprofit or limited dividend organization, and shall include 50 per cent of the homes in a
manufactured housing community, as defined by section 32Q of chapter 140, which shall be
included toward the city or town’s affordable housing threshold as documented on the subsidized
housing inventory maintained by the executive office of housing and livable communities.
of 1